Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.06, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Shortage area. "Shortage area" means: (1) licensure fields and economic development regions reported by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board as experiencing a teacher shortagenew text begin , including the number of assignments a school district is unable to fill with a licensed teacher by November 1 of every even-numbered yearnew text end ; and (2) economic development regions where the aggregate percentage of Indigenous teachers and teachers of color in the region is lower than the aggregate percentage of kindergarten through grade 12 Indigenous students and students of color in that region. Only individuals who close the gap between these percentages qualify as filling a shortage by this definition. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.09, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules subject to the provisions of chapter 14 to implement sections 120B.363, 122A.05 to 122A.09, 122A.092, 122A.16, 122A.17, 122A.18, 122A.181, 122A.182, 122A.183, 122A.184, 122A.185, 122A.187, 122A.188, 122A.19, 122A.20, 122A.21, 122A.23, 122A.26, 122A.28, 122A.29, and 124D.72. (b) The board must adopt rules relating to fields of licensure and grade levels that a licensed teacher may teach, including a process for granting permission to a licensed teacher to teach in a field that is different from the teacher's field of licensure without change to the teacher's license tier level.new text begin A permission granted under this paragraph is valid for five years, except for a permission to teach special education. A permission in the field of special education is valid for three years.new text end (c) If a rule adopted by the board is in conflict with a session law or statute, the law or statute prevails. Terms adopted in rule must be clearly defined and must not be construed to conflict with terms adopted in statute or session law. (d) The board must include a description of a proposed rule's probable effect on teacher supply and demand in the board's statement of need and reasonableness under section 14.131. (e) The board must adopt rules only under the specific statutory authority. new text begin (f) The board must adopt rules to provide a short-term provisional teaching license to an applicant who meets at least one of the following criteria during the 30 days that their application is reviewed by the board: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant is a recent graduate from a state-approved teacher preparation program; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant holds a valid out-of-state teaching license; new text end new text begin (3) the applicant holds a lifetime substitute license; or new text end new text begin (4) the applicant previously held a Minnesota teaching license in good standing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, except paragraph (f) is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.091, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Supply and demand report. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must submit a report to the education committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025, and November 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, on the supply and demand of teachers. The report must be made available on the board's website. The report must include data regarding: (1) retirement patterns; (2) teacher licensure; (3) teacher diversity, including whether the state's teacher workforce reflects the diversity of the state's student population; (4) the teacher shortage, and the substitute teacher shortage, including deleted text begin patterns and shortages in licensure field areas and the economic development regions of the statedeleted text end new text begin the number of teachers hired in the preceding two years, the number of teachers hired at each licensure tier level, the number of assignments each school district was unable to fill with a licensed teacher, and the licenses and permissions for license fields without a board-approved preparation program by economic development regionnew text end ; (5) survey data from school districts and teacher preparation programs; and (6) whether districts are making progress in hiring teachers and substitute teachers in the areas of shortage. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application requirements. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application for a Tier 1 license in a specified content area if: deleted text begin (1) the application has been submitted jointly by the applicant and the district; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end the application has been paid for by deleted text begin the district ordeleted text end the applicant; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the applicant meets the professional requirement in subdivision 2;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (4) the district or charter school affirms that the applicant has the necessary skills and knowledge to teach in the specified content area; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the deleted text begin district or charter schooldeleted text end new text begin applicantnew text end demonstrates that a criminal background check under section 122A.18, subdivision 8, has been completed on the applicantdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (6) the district or charter school has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Special education requirements. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application for a Tier 1 license in a special education field ifdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end the application meets all the requirements under subdivision 1deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) thedeleted text end new text begin (b) Anew text end district or charter school deleted text begin affirms thatdeleted text end new text begin hiring a Tier 1 licensed special education teacher must providenew text end the applicant deleted text begin will receivedeleted text end new text begin withnew text end high-quality professional development that is sustained, intensive, and classroom focused in order to have a positive and lasting impact on classroom instruction, before and while teachingdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) thedeleted text end new text begin (c) Anew text end district or charter school deleted text begin affirms thatdeleted text end new text begin hiring a Tier 1 licensed special education teacher must allownew text end the applicant deleted text begin willdeleted text end new text begin tonew text end participate in a program of intensive supervision that consists of structured guidance and regular ongoing support for teachers or a teacher mentoring programdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The applicant deleted text begin demonstrates satisfactorydeleted text end new text begin must demonstratenew text end progress toward professional licensurenew text begin during the term of their Tier 1 licensenew text end . deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end A teacher with a Tier 1 license in a special education field may assume the functions as a teacher for a period of time not to exceed three years. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 1 license for a term of deleted text begin one yeardeleted text end new text begin three yearsnew text end . A Tier 1 license may be renewed subject to paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must renew a Tier 1 license if: deleted text begin (1) the district or charter school requesting the renewal demonstrates that it has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end the teacher holding the Tier 1 license took a content examination in accordance with section 122A.185 and submitted the examination results to the teacher's employing district or charter school within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the teacher holding the Tier 1 license met the mental illness training renewal requirement under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. The requirement in clause deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end does not apply to a teacher that teaches a class in a career and technical education or career pathways course of study. (c) A Tier 1 license must not be renewed more than three times, unless the deleted text begin requesting district or charter schooldeleted text end new text begin applicantnew text end can show good cause for additional renewals. A Tier 1 license issued to teach (1) a class or course in a career and technical education or career pathway course of study, or (2) in a shortage area, as defined in section 122A.06, subdivision 6, may be renewed without limitation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Application. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must accept and review applications for a Tier 1 teaching license beginning deleted text begin Julydeleted text end new text begin Junenew text end 1 of the school year for which the license is requested; at the board's discretion, the board may begin to accept and review applications before deleted text begin Julydeleted text end new text begin Junenew text end 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Limitations on license. (a) A Tier 1 license is limited to the content matter indicated on the application for the initial Tier 1 license under subdivision 1deleted text begin , clause (4), and limited to the district or charter school that requested the initial Tier 1 licensedeleted text end . (b) A Tier 1 license does not bring an individual within the definition of a teacher for purposes of section 122A.40, subdivision 1, or 122A.41, subdivision 1, clause (a). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application for a Tier 2 license in a specified content area if: (1) the application has been submitted jointly by the applicant and the district; (2) the application has been paid for by the district or the applicant; (3) the applicant holds a bachelor's degree, unless specifically exempt by statute or rule; (4) the district demonstrates that a criminal background check under section 122A.18, subdivision 8, has been completed for the applicant; and (5) the applicant: (i) has completed a state-approved teacher preparation program; (ii) is enrolled in a deleted text begin Minnesota-approveddeleted text end new text begin state-approvednew text end teacher preparation program; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (iii) has a master's degree in the specified content areanew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (iv) has at least two years of prior teaching experience in any state with positive evaluationsnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Temporary eligibility for renewal. deleted text begin (a) From July 1, 2023, until June 30, 2024, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application for a Tier 2 license that meets the coursework requirement under subdivision 2, and other requirements under subdivision 1, clauses (1), (2), (3), and (4). deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end For the 2023-2024, 2024-2025, and 2025-2026 school years only, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application to renew a Tier 2 license for an applicant that met the Tier 2 requirements in effect at the time the first Tier 2 license was issued. Nothing in this subdivision modifies the renewal requirements in subdivision 3. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 2 license for a term of deleted text begin twodeleted text end new text begin threenew text end years. A Tier 2 license may be renewed three times. Before a Tier 2 license is renewed for the first time, a teacher holding a Tier 2 license must participate in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, and mental illness training under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. The board must issue rules setting forth the conditions for additional renewals after the initial license has been renewed three times. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Application. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must accept applications for a Tier 2 teaching license beginning deleted text begin Julydeleted text end new text begin Junenew text end 1 of the school year for which the license is requested. At the board's discretion, the board may begin to accept and review applications before deleted text begin Julydeleted text end new text begin Junenew text end 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end